Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-423
Fishing permit; recipient of old age assistance; exempt from payment of fees; condition.

Any person who is a recipient of old age assistance as provided by Chapter 68, article 10, and who is a resident of the State of Nebraska shall be exempt from the payment of any fees provided by the laws of the State of Nebraska for the privilege of fishing in Nebraska if he or she obtains a certificate from the county clerk of the county in which such person resides certifying that he or she is a recipient of old age assistance.

Laws 1951, c. 111, § 1, p. 519;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-214.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 133.